Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-234 Spouses' and reciprocal
beneficiaries' right in life insurance policy. (a) Every life
insurance policy made payable to or for the benefit of the spouse or the
reciprocal beneficiary of the insured, and every life insurance policy
assigned, transferred, or in any way made payable to a spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary, or to a trustee for the benefit of a spouse or a reciprocal
beneficiary, regardless of how the assignment or transfer is procured, shall,
unless contrary to the terms of the policy, inure to the separate use and
benefit of such spouse or reciprocal beneficiary.

(b) Without the consent of one's spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary, a married person or an individual who is registered as
a reciprocal beneficiary, may contract, pay for, take out, and hold a policy on
the life or health of one's spouse, reciprocal beneficiary, or children, or
against loss by such spouse, or reciprocal beneficiary, or children due to
disablement by accident. Premiums paid on the policy by a married person or
reciprocal beneficiary shall be held to have been that person's separate
estate, and the policy shall inure to the use and benefit of that person and
that person's children, free from any claim by the spouse, or reciprocal
beneficiary, or others. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 383, §58]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next